Utah statutes.
59-10-1013.   Tax credits for machinery, equipment, or both primarily used
for conducting qualified research or basic research -- Carry forward --
Commission to report modification or repeal of certain federal provisions --
Utah Tax Review Commission study.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Basic research" is as defined in Section 41(e)(7), Internal Revenue
Code, except that the term includes only basic research conducted in this
state.
(b)  "Equipment" includes:
(i) a computer;
(ii)  computer equipment; and
(iii)  computer software.
(c)  "Purchase price":
(i)  includes the cost of installing an item of machinery or equipment; and
(ii)  does not include a tax imposed under Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act,
on an item of machinery or equipment.
(d)  "Qualified organization" is as defined in Section 41(e)(6), Internal
Revenue Code.
(e)  "Qualified research" is as defined in Section 41(d), Internal Revenue
Code, except that the term includes only qualified research conducted in this
state.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), for taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 1999, but beginning before December 31, 2010, a
claimant, estate, or trust meeting the requirements of this section may claim
the following nonrefundable tax credits:
(i)  a tax credit of 6% of the purchase price of machinery, equipment, or
both:
(A)  purchased by the claimant, estate, or trust during the taxable year;
(B)  that is subject to a tax under Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act; and
(C)  that is primarily used to conduct qualified research in this state; and
(ii)  a tax credit of 6% of the purchase price paid by the claimant, estate,
or trust for machinery, equipment, or both:
(A)  purchased by the claimant, estate, or trust during the taxable year;
(B)  that is subject to a tax under Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act;
(C)  that is donated to a qualified organization; and
(D)  that is primarily used to conduct basic research in this state.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (4), a claimant, estate, or trust may claim a tax
credit under this section for the taxable year for which the claimant, estate,
or trust purchases the machinery, equipment, or both.
(c)  If a claimant, estate, or trust qualifies for a tax credit under
Subsection (2)(a) for a purchase of machinery, equipment, or both, the
claimant, estate, or trust may not claim the tax credit or carry the tax
credit forward if the machinery, equipment, or both, is primarily used to
conduct qualified research in the state for a time period that is less than 12
consecutive months.
(3)  Notwithstanding Section 41(h), Internal Revenue Code, a tax credit
provided for in this section is not terminated if a credit terminates under
Section 41, Internal Revenue Code.
(4) If the amount of a tax credit claimed by a claimant, estate, or trust
under this section exceeds a claimant's, estate's, or trust's tax liability
under this chapter for a taxable year, the amount of the tax credit exceeding
the tax liability:
(a)  may be carried forward for a period that does not exceed the next 14
taxable years; and
(b)  may not be carried back to a taxable year preceding the current taxable
year.
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules for purposes of this section prescribing a
certification process for qualified organizations to ensure that machinery,
equipment, or both provided to the qualified organization is to be primarily
used to conduct basic research in this state.
(6)  If a provision of Section 41, Internal Revenue Code, is modified or
repealed, the commission shall report the modification or repeal to the Utah
Tax Review Commission within 60 days after the day on which the modification
or repeal becomes effective.
(7) (a)  The Utah Tax Review Commission shall review the tax credits provided
for in this section on or before October 1 of the year after the year in which
the commission reports under Subsection (6) a modification or repeal of a
provision of Section 41, Internal Revenue Code.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(a), the Utah Tax Review Commission is not
required to review the tax credits provided for in this section if the only
modification to a provision of Section 41, Internal Revenue Code, is the
extension of the termination date provided for in Section 41(h), Internal
Revenue Code.
(c)  The Utah Tax Review Commission shall address in a review under this
section the:
(i)  cost of the tax credits provided for in this section;
(ii)  purpose and effectiveness of the tax credits provided for in this
section;
(iii)  whether the tax credits provided for in this section benefit the state;
and
(iv)  whether the tax credits provided for in this section should be:
(A)  continued;
(B)  modified; or
(C)  repealed.
(d)  If the Utah Tax Review Commission reviews the tax credits provided for in
this section, the Utah Tax Review Commission shall report its findings to the
Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee on or before the November interim
meeting of the year in which the Utah Tax Review Commission reviews the tax
credits.
